Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 5. Public School Library Collection Development Grants.

Sec. 14.56.360.
Public school library collection development grants.

There is established in the department a public school library collection development grant program.

The person or division in charge of the state library shall award and administer grants of not more than $3,000 for a fiscal year for use by a public school library eligible under AS

14.56.365

to expand and improve the library collection to include relevant and current reading materials.

If money appropriated for the program is insufficient to fund all eligible grant requests submitted under AS

14.56.365

, the available funding shall be awarded to the highest ranked applicants, according to criteria established by the department in regulation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 55, SLA 2008, which enacted this section, became effective September 2, 2008.

Sec. 14.56.365.
Eligibility.

A library eligible for a grant under AS

14.56.360

must be a public school library established and supported by a school district that

provides physical space or, if a correspondence school operated by a school district, resources for use as a library;

provides regularly scheduled library hours for all students enrolled in the school;

provides designated library personnel to staff the library;

provides acceptable evidence of the promotion of library and information literacy standards;

maintains an annual library budget that includes library staffing and materials; and

contributes, from the school district’s budget, an amount that is not less than the grant award that is paid for library collection materials or contributes in-kind value of services.

The department shall establish by regulation an application and review procedure, including requirements for submission of adequate documentation to prove eligibility under this section. Documentation must include submission of library class schedules, job descriptions for library staff, and a copy of an annual budget for the library.

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 55, SLA 2008, which enacted this section, became effective September 2, 2008.

Sec. 14.56.370.
Eligible expenditures.

A library collection development grant may be used only to purchase library collection materials by a public school or by a school district if the district operates a correspondence program with an eligible school library. In this subsection, “library collection materials” means books, magazines, reference and audio-visual materials, and electronic subscriptions that support school curriculum and student reading activities.

A library collection development grant may not be used to supplant school district expenditures for the library or to purchase classroom materials, textbooks, testing software, library automation software, computer hardware, operating software, or technology support.

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 55, SLA 2008, which enacted this section, became effective September 2, 2008.

Sec. 14.56.375.
Report.

A recipient of a grant awarded under AS

14.56.360

shall prepare a brief annual report to the department describing the effects of the grant and whether all conditions of the grant were met or exceeded.

History.

(§ 3 ch 55 SLA 2008)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 55, SLA 2008, which enacted this section, became effective September 2, 2008.